Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-433
Infraction involving controlled substance; person cited for; course of instruction; requirements.

A person cited for an infraction pursuant to section 28-416 shall be assigned to attend a course of instruction relating to the effects of the misuse of drugs, including alcohol and controlled substances. Such instruction shall include counseling on the legal, medical, psychological, and social effects of drug use and abuse. Such course shall consist of a minimum of five hours and a maximum of ten hours of instruction and counseling. Upon completion of the assigned course the instructor shall notify the court in writing of such completion and the notification shall be made a part of the record of the citation. Any person failing to complete such course within thirty days after the assignment shall be guilty of an infraction.

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 4.